Tennessee, session 114, HB2011.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 426 of the Public Acts of 2025, is amended by deleting
"December 31, 2025" in subsection (d) in SECTION 1 and substituting "June 1, 2026, at which
time the advisory committee ceases to exist".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2011
010672
- 1 -